tr: Olta kılavuzu malzemesi: Alkonit; Alüminyum oksit; Karbon; Seramik; Grafit; Silisyum karbür; Paslanmaz çelik; Titanyum; Zirkonyum; Diğer
ru: Материал колец удилища: Алконайт; Оксид алюминия; Карбон; Керамика; Графит; Карбид кремния; Нержавеющая сталь; Титан; Цирконий; Другое
ro-RO: Material al inelelor de lansetă: Alconit; Oxid de aluminiu; Carbon; Ceramică; Grafit; Carbură de siliciu; Oțel inoxidabil; Titan; Zirconiu; Altele
sk-SK: Materiál vodiacich prvkov prúta: Alconite; Oxid hlinitý; Karbón; Keramika; Grafit; Karbid kremíka; Nerezová oceľ; Titán; Zirkón; Iné
fi: Vaparenkaiden materiaali: Alconite; Alumiinioksidi; Hiili; Keraaminen; Grafiitti; Piikarbidi; Ruostumaton teräs; Titaani; Zirkonium; Muu
da: Stangringes materiale: Alconite; Aluminiumsoxid; Karbon; Keramisk; Grafit; Siliciumkarbid; Rustfrit stål; Titanium; Zirkonium; Andet
it: Materiale guida della canna: Alconite; Ossido di alluminio; Carbonio; Ceramica; Grafite; Carburo di silicio; Acciaio inossidabile; Titanio; Zirconio; Altro
zh-TW: 釣竿導環材質: Alconite; 氧化鋁; 碳纖維; 陶瓷; 石墨; 碳化矽; 不鏽鋼; 鈦金屬; 鋯; 其他
fr: Matériau des anneaux de canne: Alconite; Oxyde d’aluminium; Carbone; Céramique; Graphite; Carbure de silicium; Acier inoxydable; Titane; Zirconium; Autre
de: Material der Rutenringe: Alconite; Aluminiumoxid; Carbon; Keramik; Graphit; Siliziumkarbid; Edelstahl; Titan; Zirkonium; Sonstige
sl-SI: Material vodil ribiške palice: Alkonit; Aluminijev oksid; Ogljik; Keramika; Grafit; Silicijev karbid; Nerjavno jeklo; Titan; Cirkonij; Drugo
hu: Botvezető anyaga: Alconite; Alumínium-oxid; Karbon; Kerámia; Grafit; Szilícium-karbid; Rozsdamentes acél; Titán; Cirkónium; Egyéb
ko: 낚싯대 가이드 소재: 알코나이트; 산화알루미늄; 카본; 세라믹; 그래파이트; 탄화규소; 스테인리스 스틸; 티타늄; 지르코늄; 기타
vi: Vật liệu dẫn hướng cần câu: Alconite; Oxit nhôm; Carbon; Gốm; Graphite; Silicon carbide; Thép không gỉ; Titan; Zirconium; Khác
el: Υλικό οδηγού ράβδου: Αλκονίτης; Οξείδιο του αλουμινίου; Άνθρακας (carbon); Κεραμικό; Γραφίτης; Καρβίδιο πυριτίου; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Τιτάνιο; Ζιρκόνιο; Άλλο
th: วัสดุตัวนำคันเบ็ด: อัลโคไนต์; อลูมินัมออกไซด์; คาร์บอน; เซรามิก; กราไฟต์; ซิลิคอนคาร์ไบด์; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไทเทเนียม; เซอร์โคเนียม; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Материал на водачите за въдица: Алконит; Алуминиев оксид; Карбон; Керамика; Графит; Силициев карбид; Неръждаема стомана; Титан; Цирконий; Други
hr-HR: Materijal za vođicu šipke: Alconite; Aluminijev oksid; Karbon; Keramika; Grafit; Silicijev karbid; Nehrđajući čelik; Titanij; Cirkonij; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material das anilhas da cana: Alconite; Óxido de alumínio; Carbono; Cerâmica; Grafite; Carboneto de silício; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Zircónio; Outro
cs: Materiál vodítka udice: Alconit; Oxid hlinitý; Uhlík; Keramika; Grafit; Karbid křemíku; Nerezová ocel; Titan; Zirkonium; Jiné
sv: Material för linstyrning: Alconite; Aluminiumoxid; Kolfiber; Keramik; Grafit; Kiselkarbid; Rostfritt stål; Titan; Zirkonium; Övrigt
pl: Materiał przelotek wędki: Alconite; Tlenek glinu; Włókno węglowe; Ceramika; Grafit; Węglik krzemu; Stal nierdzewna; Tytan; Cyrkon; Inne
ja: ロッドガイド材: アルコナイト; 酸化アルミニウム; カーボン; セラミック; グラファイト; 炭化ケイ素; ステンレス鋼; チタン; ジルコニウム; その他
nb: Materiale for stangføring: Alconite; Aluminiumoksid; Karbon; Keramikk; Grafitt; Silisiumkarbid; Rustfritt stål; Titan; Zirkonium; Annet
lt-LT: Meškerės žiedelių medžiaga: Alkonitas; Aliuminio oksidas; Anglis; Keramika; Grafitas; Silicio karbidas; Nerūdijantis plienas; Titanas; Cirkonis; Kita
zh-CN: 鱼竿导环材料: 铝氧石; 氧化铝; 碳; 陶瓷; 石墨; 碳化硅; 不锈钢; 钛; 锆; 其他
es: Material guía de la caña: Alconite; Óxido de aluminio; Carbono; Cerámica; Grafito; Carburo de silicio; Acero inoxidable; Titanio; Circonio; Otro
nl: Hengel geleideoog materiaal: Alconite; Aluminiumoxide; Carbon; Keramiek; Grafiet; Siliciumcarbide; Roestvrij staal; Titanium; Zirkonium; Overige
pt-BR: Vara de pesca material do passador: Alconite; Óxido de alumínio; Carbono; Cerâmica; Grafite; Carboneto de silício; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Zircônio; Outro
en: Rod guide material: Alconite; Aluminum oxide; Carbon; Ceramic; Graphite; Silicon carbide; Stainless steel; Titanium; Zirconium; Other